Utah statutes.
63A-12-103.   Duties of governmental entities.
The chief administrative officer of each governmental entity shall:
(1)  establish and maintain an active, continuing program for the economical
and efficient management of the governmental entity's records as provided by
this chapter and Title 63G, Chapter 2, Government Records Access and
Management Act;
(2)  appoint one or more records officers who will be trained to work with the
state archives in the care, maintenance, scheduling, disposal, classification,
designation, access, and preservation of records;
(3)  ensure that officers and employees of the governmental entity that
receive or process records requests receive required training on the
procedures and requirements of this chapter and Title 63G, Chapter 2,
Government Records Access and Management Act;
(4)  make and maintain adequate and proper documentation of the organization,
functions, policies, decisions, procedures, and essential transactions of the
governmental entity designed to furnish information to protect the legal and
financial rights of persons directly affected by the entity's activities;
(5)  submit to the state archivist proposed schedules of records for final
approval by the records committee;
(6)  cooperate with the state archivist in conducting surveys made by the
state archivist;
(7)  comply with rules issued by the Department of Administrative Services as
provided by Section 63A-12-104;
(8)  report to the state archives the designation of record series that it
maintains;
(9)  report to the state archives the classification of each record series
that is classified; and
(10)  establish and report to the state archives retention schedules for
objects that the governmental entity determines are not defined as a record
under Section 63G-2-103, but that have historical or evidentiary value.
